Utah statutes.
79-4-304.   Board rulemaking authority.

(1) (a)  The board may make rules:

(i)  governing the use of the state park system;

(ii)  to protect state parks and their natural and cultural resources from misuse or damage, including watersheds, plants, wildlife, and park amenities; and

(iii)  to provide for public safety and preserve the peace within state parks.

(b)  To accomplish the purposes stated in Subsection (1)(a), the board may enact rules that:

(i)  close or partially close state parks; or

(ii)  establish use or access restrictions within state parks.

(c)  Rules made under Subsection (1) may not have the effect of preventing the transfer of livestock along a livestock highway established in accordance with Section 72-3-112.

(2)  The board shall adopt appropriate rules governing the collection of charges under Subsection 79-4-203(8).



Enacted by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

